Alabama, session 2026rs, SB376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The boundary lines and corporate limits of
the City of Semmes in Mobile County are altered and rearranged
to include within the corporate limits of the municipality, in
addition to the lands now included, all of the following
territory:
Parcel 1
BEG AT NE COR OF SE 1/4 OF SEC 21 T3S R3W RUN S 500 FT
TO A PT TH W 261.0 FT T PT N 500 FT TO A PT ON N LINE OF SE
QTR OF SEC 21 TH RUN E 261.0 FT TO POB LESS TH PT INTO R/W
Parcel Number: 2405210001027.000 Key Number: 362878
Parcel 2
COMG AT PT ON N/L OF E 1/2 OF NE 1/4 OF SE 1/4 SEC 21
T3S R3W WHICH IS 261 FT W OF NE COR OF SE 1/4 OF SEC 21 & RUN
THEN W 399 FT M/L TO NW COR OF E 1/2 OF NE 1/4 OF SE 1/4 SEC
21 & RUN THEN S 1285 FT(S) TH E 660 FT TO PT ON E/L SD SEC 21
& RUN THEN N ALG E/L SEC 21 820 FT TO PT RUN THEN W 261 FT TO
PT THEN RUN N 500 FT POB LESS PT TO R/W OF SNOW RD & BROUGHTON
RD & ALSO SW 1/4 OF NE 1/4 OF SE 1/4 SEC 21 T3S R3W #SEC 21
T3S R3W #MP24 05 21 0 001
Parcel Number: 2405210001028.000 Key Number: 362887
Parcel 3
COM AT SW COR OF NW 1/4 OF SE 1/4 OF SEC 21 T3S R3W TH
RUN S 89 DEG 41 MIN 00 SEC E ALG N/L OF CHURCHILL DOWNS 2ND
Page 1

RUN S 89 DEG 41 MIN 00 SEC E ALG N/L OF CHURCHILL DOWNS 2ND
SB376 Enrolled
UNIT 210 FT TO A PT TH RUN N 00 DEG 01 MIN 45 SEC E 210 FT TO
POB OF PPTY HEREIN DESC TH CONT N 00 DEG 01 MIN 45 SEC E 322
FT TO A PT TH RUN S 89 DEG 41 MIN 00 SEC E 450 FT TO A PT TH
RUN S 00 DEG 01 MIN 45 SEC W 532 FT TO A PT TH RUN N 89 DEG 41
MIN 00 SEC W ALG N/L OF SD SUB 240 FT TO A PT TH RUN N 00 DEG
01 MIN 45 SEC E 210 FT TO A PT TH RUN N 89 DEG 41 MIN 00 SEC W
210 FT TO POB
Parcel Number: 2405210001032.02 Key Number: 362958
Parcel 4
BEG AT SW COR OF NW 1/4 OF SE 1/4 OF SEC 21 T3S R3W RUN
N 00 DEG 01 MIN 45 SEC E 532.0 FT TO PT TH RUN S 89 DEG 41 MIN
00 SEC E 210. 0 FT TO PT TH RUN S 00 DEG 01 MIN 45 SEC W 532.0
FT TO PT TH RUN N 89 DEG 41 MIN 00 SEC W ALG N/L OF CHURCHILL
DOWNS 2ND UNIT 210 FT TO PT OF BEG CONTG 2.56 ACS #SEC 21 T3S
R3W #MP24 05 21 0 001
Parcel Number: 2405210001032.001 Key Number: 1891643
Parcel 5
FROM NW COR OF SE 1/4 OF SEC 21 T3S R3W THEN RUN S 00
DEG 21 MIN 03 SEC E 25.88 FT TO PT ON S/L OF BROUGHTON RD THEN
S 88 DEG 38 MIN 09 SEC E ALNG SAID S/L 125.05 FT TO POB OF
PPTY DESC HEREIN THEN S 88 DEG 38 MIN 09 SEC E 20 FT TO PT
THEN S 00 DEG 00 MIN 53 SEC W 470.88 FT TO PT THEN E 521.38 FT
TO PT THEN S 00 DEG 17 MIN 39 SEC E 295.36 FT TO PT THEN N 89
DEG 58 MIN 06 SEC W 662.96 FT TO PT THEN N 00 DEG 21 MIN 03
SEC W & ALNG W/L OF NW 1/4 OF SE 1/4 OF SEC 21 T3S R3W 295 FT
TO PT THEN E 121.8
Parcel Number: 2405210001033.000 Key Number: 362967
Parcel 6
Page 2

Parcel 6
SB376 Enrolled
FROM THE NW COR OF THE NW 1/4 OF THE SE 1/4 OF SEC 21
T3S R3W RUN S 26 FT TO A PT ON THE S ROW LINE OF BROUGHTON RD
FOR THE POB TH N 88 DEG 38 MIN 09 SEC W ALG THE S ROW LINE OF
BROUGHTON RD 157.46 FT THE S 00 DEG 21 MIN 03 SEC E 397.75 FT
TH E 154.98 FT TH N 394 FT TO THE POB #SEC 21 T3S R3W #MP24 05
21 0 001
Parcel Number: 2405210001037.001 Key Number: 2035014
Section 2. In accordance with Section 11-42-6 of the
Code of Alabama 1975, a map showing the proposed territory to
be altered, rearranged, and extended from the City of Semmes
is on file and open to public inspection in the Office of the
Judge of Probate in Mobile County, Alabama.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
SB376 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB376
Senate 02-Apr-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 08-Apr-26

100
101
102
103 By: Senator Williams
Page 4